Utah statutes.
53-7-311.   Certification of licensees for certain activities.

(1)  A person that transports or dispenses LPG or that installs, repairs, or services appliances, containers, equipment, systems, or piping for the use of LPG shall be certified by the division by passing an appropriate examination based on the safety requirements of the board.

(2) (a)  A trainee employee is exempt from this examination for 45 working days, and until examined by a representative of the board.  A trainee employee, during the 45-day period, shall be supervised by a qualified instructor.

(b)  Any LPG licensee hiring a trainee shall, within 20 days of the commencement of employment, notify the board, so that an examination may be scheduled.  If the trainee fails to pass the examination, the trainee may retake it after additional instruction.  Prior to retaking the exam, the trainee shall again be supervised by a qualified instructor.

(3) (a)  The board shall establish a reasonable fee in accordance with Section 53-7-314 to cover the costs of administering the examination.

(b)  All examinations shall be administered by the division.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 234, 1993 General Session

